Mississippi, session 2026, HB1289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-7-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-7-11.  (1)  Every vehicle operated upon a public road, street or highway within this state * * *during the period from sunset to sunrise and at any other time when there is not sufficient light to render clearly discernible any person on the highway at a distance of five hundred (500) feet ahead shall be equipped with lighted front and rear lamps as respectively required in Section 63-7-13 for different classes of vehicles and subject to exemption with reference to lights on parked vehicles as hereinafter stated in this chapter, and the front and rear lamps shall be operated on every vehicle during the following times: (a)  The period from sunset to sunrise; (b)  Whenever precipitation or any other condition necessitates the use of windshield wipers by vehicle operators; and (c)  At any other time when there is not sufficient light to render clearly discernible any person on the highway at a distance of five hundred (500) feet ahead. (2)  It is unlawful for any vehicle operator to use only the parking lights or auxiliary driving lamps of the vehicle during any time when this section requires the use of the front and rear lamps of the vehicle. (3)  Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), upon conviction. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.